ko: 오디오 믹서 타입: 아날로그; 콤팩트; 디지털; 라이브 사운드; 랙; 스트리밍; 합산; USB; 가상; 기타
pt-BR: Tipo de mixer de áudio: Analógico; Compacto; Digital; Som ao vivo; Prateleira; Transmissão; Sintetização; USB; Virtual; Outro
zh-TW: 混音器類型: 類比; 小巧; 數位; 現場音效; 貨架; 串流; 加總處理; USB; 虛擬; 其他
bg-BG: Тип аудиомиксер: Аналогов; Компактен; Цифров; Звук на живо; Рак; Стрийминг; Сумиране; USB; Виртуален; Други
hr-HR: Vrsta audio miksete: Analogni; Kompaktni; Digitalni; Live; Rack; Streaming; Summing; USB; Virtualni; Ostalo
it: Tipo di mixer audio: Analog; Compatta; Digital; Suono dal vivo; Scaffale; Streaming; Riassumendo; USB; Virtuale; Altro
ja: オーディオミキサータイプ: アナログ; コンパクト; デジタル; ライブサウンド; ラック; ストリーミング; 合計; USB; バーチャル; その他
lt-LT: Garso maišytuvo tipas: Analoginis; Kompaktiškas; Skaitmeninis; Gyvo garso; Pultas; Srautinis perdavimas; Suminis; USB; Virtualus; Kita
en: Audio mixer type: Analog; Compact; Digital; Live sound; Rack; Streaming; Summing; USB; Virtual; Other
sv: Typ av ljudmixer: Analog; Kompakt; Digital; Live ljud; Kuggstång; Streaming; Summering; USB; Virtual; Övrigt
zh-CN: 音频混音器类型: 模拟; 压缩式; 数字化; 现场声音; 架子; 流媒体; 多轨合并 (Summing); USB; 虚拟; 其他
ru: Тип аудиомикшера: Аналоговый; Компактный; Цифровой; Живой звук; Стойка; Потоковое воспроизведение; Суммирование; USB; Виртуальный; Другой
sl-SI: Vrsta mešalnika zvoka: Analogno; Kompaktno; Digitalno; Zvok v živo; Na stojalu; Pretakanje; Seštevanje; USB; Virtualno; Drugo
fi: Audiomikserityyppi: Analoginen; Kompakti; Digitaalinen; Liveääni; Teline; Suoratoisto; Summaaminen; USB; Virtuaalinen; Muu
fr: Type de mélangeur audio: Analogique; Compact; Numérique; Son en direct; Support; Streaming; Synthèse; USB; Virtuel; Autre
pl: Rodzaj miksera audio: Analogowy; Kompaktowy; Cyfrowe; Dźwięk na żywo; Regał; Strumieniowanie; Sumowanie kanałów; USB; Wirtualny; Inne
tr: Ses karıştırıcı tipi: Analog; Kompakt; Dijital; Canlı ses; Raf; Yayın Akışı; Toplama; USB; Sanal; Diğer
th: ประเภทมิกเซอร์เสียง: อนาล็อก; แบบกะทัดรัด; ดิจิทัล; เสียงสด; ขายึดในตู้; สัญญาณต่อเนื่อง; การรวมสัญญาณ; USB; จำลองเสียง; อื่นๆ
vi: Loại bộ trộn âm thanh: Analog; Nhỏ gọn; Kỹ thuật số; Âm thanh trực tiếp; Giá kệ; Streaming; Tổng hợp; USB; Ảo; Khác
nb: Lydmiksertype: Analog; Kompakt; Digital; Live lyd; Stativ; Strømming; Summering; USB; Virtuell; Annet
de: Audio-Mischpulttyp: Analog; Kompakt; Digital; Live-Sound; Gestell; Streaming; Summieren; USB; Virtual; Sonstiges
pt-PT: Tipo de misturador de áudio: Analógico; Compacto; Digital; Som ao vivo; Estante; Streaming; Resumindo; USB; Virtual; Outro
es: Tipo de mesa de mezclas: Analógico; Compacto; Digital; Sonido en vivo; Bastidor; Transmisión; Sumador; USB; Virtual; Otros
ro-RO: Tip de mixer audio: Analogic; Compact; Digital; Sunet live; Stativ; Streaming; Summing; USB; Virtual; Altele
sk-SK: Typ zmiešavača zvuku: Analógový; Kompaktný; Digitálny; Živý zvuk; Stojan; Streamovanie; Sumačný; USB; Virtuálny; Iné
cs: Typ mixážního pultu: Analogový; Kompaktní; Digitální; Živý zvuk; Regál; Streamování; Suma; USB; Virtuální; Jiné
hu: Hangkeverő típusa: Analóg; Kompakt; Digitális; Élő hang; Beépíthető; Streamelés; Összegzés; USB; Virtuális; Egyéb
nl: Type audiomixer: Analoog; Compact; Digitaal; Live geluid; Rack; Streamen; Opsomming; USB; Virtual; Andere
el: Τύπος μίκτη ήχου: Αναλογικός; Μικρών διαστάσεων; Ψηφιακός; Ζωντανός ήχος; Rack; Συνεχούς ροής; Αθροιστικός; USB; Εικονικός; Άλλο
da: Lydmixertype: Analog; Kompakt; Digital; Livelyd; Rack; Streaming; Summing; USB; Virtuel; Andet